Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-512
Associations of school boards; membership dues; payment authorized.

The school board or board of education of any school district in this state may pay from its school funds an amount to be determined by the board for membership dues in associations of school boards or boards of education.

Laws 1957, c. 345, § 1, p. 1188;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,149;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 265.